Connecticut, session 2026, HB05223.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective from passage) (a) There is established a task force
to study issues concerning grocery store beer permits. Such study shall
include, but need not be limited to, an examination of (1) the feasibility
of establishing a per capita cap on the number of grocery store beer
permits that may be issued within a municipality, and (2) the criteria
applied to assess eligibility for a grocery store beer permit.
(b) The task force shall consist of the following members:
(1) Two appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives;
(2) Two appointed by the president pro tempore of the Senate;
(3) One appointed by the majority leader of the House of
Representatives;
sHB5223 / File No. 184 1

sHB5223 File No. 184
(4) One appointed by the majority leader of the Senate;
(5) One appointed by the minority leader of the House of
Representatives;
(6) One appointed by the minority leader of the Senate;
(7) One appointed by the House chairperson of the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to consumer protection;
(8) One appointed by the Senate chairperson of the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to consumer protection;
(9) One appointed by the House ranking member of the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to consumer protection;
(10) One appointed by the Senate ranking member of the joint
standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to consumer protection;
(11) The Commissioner of Consumer Protection, or the
commissioner's designee; and
(12) Two appointed by the Governor.
(c) Any member of the task force appointed under subdivision (1),
(2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), (9) or (10) of subsection (b) of this section may
be a member of the General Assembly.
(d) All initial appointments to the task force shall be made not later
than thirty days after the effective date of this section. Any vacancy shall
be filled by the appointing authority.
(e) The speaker of the House of Representatives and the president pro
tempore of the Senate shall select the chairpersons of the task force from
among the members of the task force. Such chairpersons shall schedule
sHB5223 / File No. 184 2

sHB5223 File No. 184
the first meeting of the task force, which shall be held not later than sixty
days after the effective date of this section.
(f) The administrative staff of the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to consumer
protection shall serve as administrative staff of the task force.
(g) Not later than January 1, 2027, the task force shall submit a report
on its findings and recommendations to the joint standing committee of
the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to
consumer protection, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a
of the general statutes. The task force shall terminate on the date that it
submits such report or January 1, 2027, whichever is later.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Subsec. (c), "subdivisions (1) to (10), inclusive," was changed to
"subdivision (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), (9) or (10)" for accuracy.
GL Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sHB5223 / File No. 184 3

sHB5223 File No. 184
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill creates a task force to study issues concerning grocery store
beer permits resulting in no fiscal impact to the state as the task force
has the expertise to meet the requirements of the bill.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
sHB5223 / File No. 184 4

sHB5223 File No. 184
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5223
AN ACT ESTABLISHING A TASK FORCE TO STUDY ISSUES
CONCERNING GROCERY STORE BEER PERMITS.